Ohio, session 136, SB290.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 3314.03, 3326.11, and 3328.24 be amended and section 3313.475 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3313.475. (A) Not later than June 30, 2027, each school district and chartered nonpublic school shall purchase and install at least one exterior secure master key box for each school building operated by the district or school that is assigned an internal retrieval number by the department of education and workforce. An exterior secure master key box shall be installed on the school building or in a strategic location for optimal law enforcement response on school premises. The master key box shall permit emergency access to both law enforcement agencies and emergency responders from an exterior location designated by the local law enforcement authorities. Each master key box shall meet the standards prescribed under underwriters laboratories standard 1037. Each district or school shall collaborate with law enforcement to include in the master key box all of the following: (1) Master external and internal keys; (2) Access cards; (3) Maps of the school buildings. (B) A district or school shall provide updates of school building maps to local law enforcement agencies and emergency responders when substantial modifications, such as new facilities, are made to a school building. A district or school shall also notify local law enforcement agencies and emergency responders when changes are made to master external keys, master internal keys, or access cards and ensure that all are in current operable form. (C) A district or school may apply for a school safety training grant awarded by the attorney general to pay for the cost of purchasing and installing an exterior secure master key box under this section. (D) Any record that discloses the location of an exterior secure master key box on a school building or on school premises is not a public record under section 149.43 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3314.03. A copy of every contract entered into under this section shall be filed with the director of education and workforce. The department of education and workforce shall make available on its web site a copy of every approved, executed contract filed with the director under this section. (A) Each contract entered into between a sponsor and the governing authority of a community school shall specify the following: (1) That the school shall be established as either of the following: (a) A nonprofit corporation established under Chapter 1702. of the Revised Code, if established prior to April 8, 2003; (b) A public benefit corporation established under Chapter 1702. of the Revised Code, if established after April 8, 2003. (2) The education program of the school, including the school's mission and educational philosophy, the characteristics of the students the school is expected to attract, the ages and grades of students, and the focus of the curriculum; (3) The academic goals to be achieved and the method of measurement that will be used to determine progress toward those goals, which shall include the statewide achievement assessments; (4) Performance standards, including but not limited to all applicable report card measures set forth in section 3302.03 or 3314.017 of the Revised Code, by which the success of the school will be evaluated by the sponsor; (5) The admission standards of section 3314.06 of the Revised Code and, if applicable, section 3314.061 of the Revised Code; (6)(a) Dismissal procedures; (b) A requirement that the governing authority adopt an attendance policy that includes a procedure for automatically withdrawing a student from the school if the student without a legitimate excuse fails to participate in seventy-two consecutive hours of the learning opportunities offered to the student. (7) The ways by which the school will achieve racial and ethnic balance reflective of the community it serves; (8) Requirements for financial audits by the auditor of state. The contract shall require financial records of the school to be maintained in the same manner as are financial records of school districts, pursuant to rules of the auditor of state. Audits shall be conducted in accordance with section 117.10 of the Revised Code. (9) An addendum to the contract outlining the facilities to be used that contains at least the following information: (a) A detailed description of each facility used for instructional purposes; (b) The annual costs associated with leasing each facility that are paid by or on behalf of the school; (c) The annual mortgage principal and interest payments that are paid by the school; (d) The name of the lender or landlord, identified as such, and the lender's or landlord's relationship to the operator, if any. (10) Qualifications of employees, including both of the following: (a) A requirement that the school's classroom teachers be licensed in accordance with sections 3319.22 to 3319.31 of the Revised Code, except that a community school may engage noncertificated persons to teach up to twelve hours or forty hours per week pursuant to section 3319.301 of the Revised Code; (b) A prohibition against the school employing an individual described in section 3314.104 of the Revised Code in any position. (11) That the school will comply with the following requirements: (a) The school will provide learning opportunities to a minimum of twenty-five students for a minimum of nine hundred twenty hours per school year. (b) The governing authority will purchase liability insurance, or otherwise provide for the potential liability of the school. (c) The school will be nonsectarian in its programs, admission policies, employment practices, and all other operations, and will not be operated by a sectarian school or religious institution. (d) The school will comply with sections 9.90, 9.91, 109.65, 121.22, 149.43, 2151.357, 2151.421, 2313.19, 3301.0710, 3301.0711, 3301.0712, 3301.0715, 3301.0729, 3301.24, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3313.472, 3313.473, 3313.474, 3313.475, 3313.50, 3313.539, 3313.5310, 3313.5318, 3313.5319, 3313.608, 3313.609, 3313.6012, 3313.6013, 3313.6014, 3313.6020, 3313.6024, 3313.6026, 3313.6028, 3313.6029, 3313.6031, 3313.643, 3313.648, 3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.66, 3313.661, 3313.662, 3313.666, 3313.667, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.67, 3313.671, 3313.672, 3313.673, 3313.69, 3313.71, 3313.716, 3313.718, 3313.719, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.80, 3313.814, 3313.816, 3313.817, 3313.818, 3313.819, 3313.8110, 3313.86, 3313.89, 3313.96, 3319.073, 3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.0812, 3319.238, 3319.318, 3319.321, 3319.324, 3319.39, 3319.391, 3319.393, 3319.41, 3319.46, 3319.90, 3319.614, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3321.01, 3321.041, 3321.13, 3321.14, 3321.141, 3321.17, 3321.18, 3321.19, 3322.20, 3322.24, 3323.251, 3327.10, 4111.17, 4113.52, 5502.262, 5502.703, and 5705.391 and Chapters 117., 1347., 2744., 3365., 3742., 4112., 4123., 4141., and 4167. of the Revised Code as if it were a school district and will comply with section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code in the manner specified in section 3314.17 of the Revised Code. (e) The school shall comply with Chapter 102. and section 2921.42 of the Revised Code. (f) The school will comply with sections 3313.61, 3313.611, 3313.614, 3313.617, 3313.618, and 3313.6114 of the Revised Code, except that for students who enter ninth grade for the first time before July 1, 2010, the requirement in sections 3313.61 and 3313.611 of the Revised Code that a person must successfully complete the curriculum in any high school prior to receiving a high school diploma may be met by completing the curriculum adopted by the governing authority of the community school rather than the curriculum specified in Title XXXIII of the Revised Code or any rules of the department. Beginning with students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2010, the requirement in sections 3313.61 and 3313.611 of the Revised Code that a person must successfully complete the curriculum of a high school prior to receiving a high school diploma shall be met by completing the requirements prescribed in section 3313.6027 and division (C) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code, unless the person qualifies under division (D) or (F) of that section. Each school shall comply with the plan for awarding high school credit based on demonstration of subject area competency, and beginning with the 2017-2018 school year, with the updated plan that permits students enrolled in seventh and eighth grade to meet curriculum requirements based on subject area competency adopted by the department under divisions (J)(1) and (2) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code. Beginning with the 2018-2019 school year, the school shall comply with the framework for granting units of high school credit to students who demonstrate subject area competency through work-based learning experiences, internships, or cooperative education developed by the department under division (J)(3) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code. (g) The school governing authority will submit within four months after the end of each school year a report of its activities and progress in meeting the goals and standards of divisions (A)(3) and (4) of this section and its financial status to the sponsor and the parents of all students enrolled in the school. (h) The school, unless it is an internet- or computer-based community school, will comply with section 3313.801 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. (i) If the school is the recipient of moneys from a grant awarded under the federal race to the top program, Division (A), Title XIV, Sections 14005 and 14006 of the "American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009," Pub. L. No. 111-5, 123 Stat. 115, the school will pay teachers based upon performance in accordance with section 3317.141 and will comply with section 3319.111 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. (j) If the school operates a preschool program that is licensed by the department under sections 3301.52 to 3301.59 of the Revised Code, the school shall comply with sections 3301.50 to 3301.59 of the Revised Code and the minimum standards for preschool programs prescribed in rules adopted by the department of children and youth under section 3301.53 of the Revised Code. (k) The school will comply with sections 3313.6021 and 3313.6023 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district unless it is either of the following: (i) An internet- or computer-based community school; (ii) A community school in which a majority of the enrolled students are children with disabilities as described in division (B)(2) of section 3314.35 of the Revised Code. (l) The school will comply with section 3321.191 of the Revised Code, unless it is an internet- or computer-based community school that is subject to section 3314.261 of the Revised Code. (m) The school will comply with section 3313.7118 of the Revised Code if it serves elementary school students. (12) Arrangements for providing health and other benefits to employees; (13) The length of the contract, which shall begin at the beginning of an academic year. No contract shall exceed five years unless such contract has been renewed pursuant to division (D) of this section. (14) The governing authority of the school, which shall be responsible for carrying out the provisions of the contract; (15) A financial plan detailing an estimated school budget for each year of the period of the contract and specifying the total estimated per pupil expenditure amount for each such year. (16) Requirements and procedures regarding the disposition of employees of the school in the event the contract is terminated or not renewed pursuant to section 3314.07 of the Revised Code; (17) Whether the school is to be created by converting all or part of an existing public school or educational service center building or is to be a new start-up school, and if it is a converted public school or service center building, both of the following: (a) Specification of any duties or responsibilities of an employer that the board of education or service center governing board that operated the school or building before conversion is delegating to the governing authority of the community school with respect to all or any specified group of employees provided the delegation is not prohibited by a collective bargaining agreement applicable to such employees; (b) Alternative arrangements for current public school students who choose not to attend the converted school and for teachers who choose not to teach in the school or building after conversion. (18) Provisions establishing procedures for resolving disputes or differences of opinion between the sponsor and the governing authority of the community school; (19) A provision requiring the governing authority to adopt a policy regarding the admission of students who reside outside the district in which the school is located. That policy shall comply with the admissions procedures specified in sections 3314.06 and 3314.061 of the Revised Code and, at the sole discretion of the authority, shall do one of the following: (a) Prohibit the enrollment of students who reside outside the district in which the school is located; (b) Permit the enrollment of students who reside in districts adjacent to the district in which the school is located; (c) Permit the enrollment of students who reside in any other district in the state. (20) A provision recognizing the authority of the department to take over the sponsorship of the school in accordance with the provisions of division (C) of section 3314.015 of the Revised Code; (21) A provision recognizing the sponsor's authority to assume the operation of a school under the conditions specified in division (B) of section 3314.073 of the Revised Code; (22) A provision recognizing both of the following: (a) The authority of public health and safety officials to inspect the facilities of the school and to order the facilities closed if those officials find that the facilities are not in compliance with health and safety laws and regulations; (b) The authority of the department as the community school oversight body to suspend the operation of the school under section 3314.072 of the Revised Code if the department has evidence of conditions or violations of law at the school that pose an imminent danger to the health and safety of the school's students and employees and the sponsor refuses to take such action. (23) A description of the learning opportunities that will be offered to students including both classroom-based and non-classroom-based learning opportunities that is in compliance with criteria for student participation established by the department under division (H)(2) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code; (24) The school will comply with sections 3302.04 and 3302.041 of the Revised Code, except that any action required to be taken by a school district pursuant to those sections shall be taken by the sponsor of the school. (25) Beginning in the 2006-2007 school year, the school will open for operation not later than the thirtieth day of September each school year, unless the mission of the school as specified under division (A)(2) of this section is solely to serve dropouts. In its initial year of operation, if the school fails to open by the thirtieth day of September, or within one year after the adoption of the contract pursuant to division (D) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code if the mission of the school is solely to serve dropouts, the contract shall be void. (26) Whether the school's governing authority is planning to seek designation for the school as a STEM school equivalent under section 3326.032 of the Revised Code; (27) That the school's attendance and participation policies will be available for public inspection; (28) That the school's attendance and participation records shall be made available to the department, auditor of state, and school's sponsor to the extent permitted under and in accordance with the "Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974," 88 Stat. 571, 20 U.S.C. 1232g, as amended, and any regulations promulgated under that act, and section 3319.321 of the Revised Code; (29) If a school operates using the blended learning model, as defined in section 3301.079 of the Revised Code, all of the following information: (a) An indication of what blended learning model or models will be used; (b) A description of how student instructional needs will be determined and documented; (c) The method to be used for determining competency, granting credit, and promoting students to a higher grade level; (d) The school's attendance requirements, including how the school will document participation in learning opportunities; (e) A statement describing how student progress will be monitored; (f) A statement describing how private student data will be protected; (g) A description of the professional development activities that will be offered to teachers. (30) A provision requiring that all moneys the school's operator loans to the school, including facilities loans or cash flow assistance, must be accounted for, documented, and bear interest at a fair market rate; (31) A provision requiring that, if the governing authority contracts with an attorney, accountant, or entity specializing in audits, the attorney, accountant, or entity shall be independent from the operator with which the school has contracted. (32) A provision requiring the governing authority to adopt an enrollment and attendance policy that requires a student's parent to notify the community school in which the student is enrolled when there is a change in the location of the parent's or student's primary residence. (33) A provision requiring the governing authority to adopt a student residence and address verification policy for students enrolling in or attending the school. (34) A provision establishing the process by which the governing authority of the school will be selected in the future. (35) A description of the management and administration of the school. (36) A provision requiring the governing authority to adopt policies and procedures to establish internal financial controls for the school. (B) A contract entered into under section 3314.02 of the Revised Code between a sponsor and the governing authority of a community school may provide for the community school governing authority to make payments to the sponsor, which is hereby authorized to receive such payments as set forth in the contract between the governing authority and the sponsor. The total amount of such payments for monitoring, oversight, and technical assistance of the school shall not exceed three per cent of the total amount of payments for operating expenses that the school receives from the state. (C) The contract shall specify the duties of the sponsor which shall be in accordance with the written agreement entered into with the department under division (B) of section 3314.015 of the Revised Code and shall include the following: (1) Monitor the community school's compliance with all laws applicable to the school and with the terms of the contract; (2) Monitor and evaluate the academic and fiscal performance and the organization and operation of the community school on at least an annual basis; (3) Provide technical assistance to the community school in complying with laws applicable to the school and terms of the contract; (4) Take steps to intervene in the school's operation to correct problems in the school's overall performance, declare the school to be on probationary status pursuant to section 3314.073 of the Revised Code, suspend the operation of the school pursuant to section 3314.072 of the Revised Code, or terminate the contract of the school pursuant to section 3314.07 of the Revised Code as determined necessary by the sponsor; (5) Have in place a plan of action to be undertaken in the event the community school experiences financial difficulties or closes prior to the end of a school year. (D) Upon the expiration of a contract entered into under this section, the sponsor of a community school may, with the approval of the governing authority of the school, renew that contract for a period of time determined by the sponsor, but not ending earlier than the end of any school year, if the sponsor finds that the school's compliance with applicable laws and terms of the contract and the school's progress in meeting the academic goals prescribed in the contract have been satisfactory. Any contract that is renewed under this division remains subject to the provisions of sections 3314.07, 3314.072, and 3314.073 of the Revised Code. (E) If a community school fails to open for operation within one year after the contract entered into under this section is adopted pursuant to division (D) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code or permanently closes prior to the expiration of the contract, the contract shall be void and the school shall not enter into a contract with any other sponsor. A school shall not be considered permanently closed because the operations of the school have been suspended pursuant to section 3314.072 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3326.11. Each science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under this chapter and its governing body shall comply with sections 9.90, 9.91, 109.65, 121.22, 149.43, 2151.357, 2151.421, 2313.19, 2921.42, 2921.43, 3301.0714, 3301.0715, 3301.0729, 3301.24, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3313.14, 3313.15, 3313.16, 3313.18, 3313.201, 3313.26, 3313.472, 3313.473, 3313.474, 3313.475, 3313.48, 3313.481, 3313.482, 3313.50, 3313.539, 3313.5310, 3313.5318, 3313.5319, 3313.608, 3313.6012, 3313.6013, 3313.6014, 3313.6020, 3313.6021, 3313.6023, 3313.6024, 3313.6026, 3313.6028, 3313.6029, 3313.6031, 3313.61, 3313.611, 3313.614, 3313.615, 3313.617, 3313.618, 3313.6114, 3313.643, 3313.648, 3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.66, 3313.661, 3313.662, 3313.666, 3313.667, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.67, 3313.671, 3313.672, 3313.673, 3313.69, 3313.71, 3313.716, 3313.717, 3313.718, 3313.719, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3313.7118, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.80, 3313.801, 3313.814, 3313.816, 3313.817, 3313.818, 3313.819, 3313.8110, 3313.86, 3313.89, 3313.96, 3319.073, 3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.0812, 3319.21, 3319.238, 3319.318, 3319.32, 3319.321, 3319.324, 3319.35, 3319.39, 3319.391, 3319.393, 3319.41, 3319.45, 3319.46, 3319.614, 3319.90, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3321.01, 3321.041, 3321.05, 3321.13, 3321.14, 3321.141, 3321.17, 3321.18, 3321.19, 3321.191, 3322.20, 3322.24, 3323.251, 3327.10, 4111.17, 4113.52, 5502.262, 5502.703, and 5705.391 and Chapters 102., 117., 1347., 2744., 3307., 3309., 3365., 3742., 4112., 4123., 4141., and 4167. of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. Sec. 3328.24. A college-preparatory boarding school established under this chapter and its board of trustees shall comply with sections 102.02, 3301.0710, 3301.0711, 3301.0712, 3301.0714, 3301.0729, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3313.474, 3313.475, 3313.5318, 3313.5319, 3313.6013, 3313.6021, 3313.6023, 3313.6024, 3313.6026, 3313.6029, 3313.6031, 3313.617, 3313.618, 3313.6114, 3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.717, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.8110, 3313.89, 3319.073, 3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.318, 3319.324, 3319.39, 3319.391, 3319.393, 3319.46, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3323.251, and 5502.262, and Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code as if the school were a school district and the school's board of trustees were a district board of education. Section 2. That existing sections 3314.03, 3326.11, and 3328.24 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. That Section 221.20 of H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly (as amended by H.B. 184 of the 136th General Assembly) be amended to read as follows: Sec. 221.20. OHIO CENTER FOR THE FUTURE OF FORENSIC SCIENCE Of the foregoing appropriation item 055321, Operating Expenses, $650,000 in each fiscal year shall be used for the Ohio Center for the Future of Forensic Science at Bowling Green State University. The purpose of the Center shall be to foster forensic science research techniques (BCI Eminent Scholar) and to create professional training opportunities to students (BCI Scholars) in the forensic science fields. DOMESTIC VIOLENCE PROGRAM Of the foregoing appropriation item 055321, Operating Expenses, $100,000 in each fiscal year may be used by the Attorney General for the purpose of providing funding to domestic violence programs as defined in section 109.46 of the Revised Code. BUREAU OF CRIMINAL INVESTIGATION RECORDS SYSTEM (BCIRS) LEASE RENTAL PAYMENTS The foregoing appropriation item 055406, BCIRS Lease Rental Payments, shall be used for payments during the period from July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2027, pursuant to leases and agreements entered into pursuant to Section 701.40 of S.B. 310 of the 131st General Assembly and other prior acts of the General Assembly, with respect to financing the costs associated with the acquisition, development, implementation, and integration of the BCIRS. COUNTY SHERIFFS' PAY SUPPLEMENT The foregoing appropriation item 055411, County Sheriffs' Pay Supplement, shall be used for the purpose of supplementing the annual compensation of county sheriffs as required by section 325.06 of the Revised Code. At the request of the Attorney General, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer appropriation from appropriation item 055321, Operating Expenses, to appropriation item 055411, County Sheriffs' Pay Supplement. Any appropriation so transferred shall be used to supplement the annual compensation of county sheriffs as required by section 325.06 of the Revised Code. COUNTY PROSECUTORS' PAY SUPPLEMENT The foregoing appropriation item 055415, County Prosecutors' Pay Supplement, shall be used for the purpose of supplementing the annual compensation of certain county prosecutors as required by section 325.111 of the Revised Code. At the request of the Attorney General, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer appropriation from appropriation item 055321, Operating Expenses, to appropriation item 055415, County Prosecutors' Pay Supplement. Any appropriation so transferred shall be used to supplement the annual compensation of county prosecutors as required by section 325.111 of the Revised Code. DRUG ABUSE RESPONSE TEAM GRANT PROGRAM The Attorney General shall maintain the Drug Abuse Response Team Grant Program for the purpose of replicating or expanding successful law enforcement programs that address the opioid epidemic similar to the Drug Abuse Response Team established by the Lucas County Sheriff's Department, and the Quick Response Teams established in Colerain Township's Department of Public Safety in Hamilton County and Summit County. Any grants awarded by this grant program may include requirements for private or nonprofit matching support. The foregoing appropriation items 055431, Drug Abuse Response Team Grants, and 055610, Drug Abuse Response Team Grants, shall be used by the Attorney General to fund grants to law enforcement or other government agencies; the primary purpose of the grants shall be to replicate or expand successful law enforcement programs that address the opioid epidemic similar to the Drug Abuse Response Team established by the Lucas County Sheriff's Department and the Quick Response Teams established in Colerain Township's Department of Public Safety in Hamilton County and Summit County. Each recipient of a grant under this program shall, within six months of the end date of the grant, submit a written report describing the outcomes that resulted from the grant to the Governor, the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Minority Leader of the Senate, and the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives. DRUG TESTING EQUIPMENT The foregoing appropriation item 055432, Drug Testing Equipment, shall be used to purchase, operate, and maintain drug testing equipment for the Bureau of Criminal Identification and Investigation. INTERNET CRIMES AGAINST CHILDREN TASK FORCE The foregoing appropriation item 055434, Internet Crimes Against Children Task Force, shall be used by the Attorney General in support of the Ohio Internet Crimes Against Children Task Force for the purposes described in section 195.02 of the Revised Code. VICTIMS OF CRIME The foregoing appropriation item 055441, Victims of Crime, shall be allocated to the Crime Victim Services Section. Prior to using the funds from this appropriation item, the Attorney General shall, to the extent possible, first use funds related to the federal Victims of Crime Act. CLEVELAND RAPE CRISIS CENTER Of the foregoing appropriation item 055501, Rape Crisis Centers, $300,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to the Cleveland Rape Crisis Center to provide services for at-risk youth through the Cleveland Rape Crisis Center Human Trafficking Drop-in Center. SCHOOL SAFETY TRAINING GRANTS (A) The foregoing appropriation item 055502, School Safety Training Grants, shall be used by the Attorney General, in consultation with the Director of Education and Workforce and the Director of Behavioral Health, solely to make grants to public and chartered nonpublic schools, educational service centers, local law enforcement agencies, and schools operated by county boards of developmental disabilities administering special education services programs pursuant to section 5126.05 of the Revised Code for school safety and school climate programs and training. (B) The use of the grants includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: (1) The support of school resource officer certification training; (2) Any type of active shooter and school safety training or equipment; (3) All grade level type educational resources; (4) Training to identify and assist students with mental health issues; (5) School supplies or equipment related to school safety or for implementing the school's safety plan; (6) The purchase and installation of an exterior secure master key box in accordance with section 3313.475 of the Revised Code; (6)(7) Any other training, supplies, services, or equipment related to school safety. (C) The schools, educational service centers, and county boards shall work or contract with the county sheriff's office or a local police department in whose jurisdiction they are located to develop the programs and training described in divisions (B)(1), (2), (3), (5), and (6)(7) of this section. Any grant awarded directly to a local law enforcement agency, or to a nonprofit or charitable law enforcement training organization on the law enforcement agency's behalf, shall not be used to fund a similar request made by a school located within the jurisdiction of the local law enforcement agency. (D) The Attorney General is authorized to make payments directly to school or law enforcement nonprofit or charitable training organizations on behalf of any public and chartered nonpublic schools, educational service centers, local law enforcement agencies, and schools operated by county boards of developmental disabilities administering special education services. (E) As used in this section, "public school" means any school operated by a school district board of education, any community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, and any STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code. DOMESTIC VIOLENCE PROGRAMS The foregoing appropriation item 055504, Domestic Violence Programs, shall be used by the Attorney General for the purpose of funding domestic violence programs as defined in section 109.46 of the Revised Code. FINDING MY CHILDHOOD AGAIN PILOT PROGRAM Of the foregoing appropriation item 055504, Domestic Violence Programs, $300,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to the Battered Women's Shelter of Summit and Medina counties for expenses related to the creation and implementation of a pilot program called "Finding my Childhood Again." BATTERED WOMEN'S SHELTER Of the foregoing appropriation item 055504, Domestic Violence Programs, $50,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to the Battered Women's Shelter of Summit and Medina counties for the cost of operating the commercial kitchen located at its Market Street Facility, and $50,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to the Battered Women's Shelter of Portage County. TRANSPORTATION GRANTS Of the foregoing appropriation item 055504, Domestic Violence Programs, $25,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be provided as grants to Ohio domestic violence shelters to buy transportation vouchers, ridesharing credits, or gas cards for eligible clients. The Attorney General shall adopt any rules necessary for the administration of the grant program. PIKE COUNTY CAPITAL CASE An amount equal to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of appropriation item 055505, Pike County Capital Case, at the end of fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item for the same purpose in fiscal year 2026. An amount equal to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of appropriation item 055505, Pike County Capital Case, at the end of fiscal year 2026 is hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item for the same purpose in fiscal year 2027. LAW ENFORCEMENT TRAINING The foregoing appropriation item 055509, Law Enforcement Training, shall be used by the Attorney General for state funding of the training of peace officers and troopers that is required under section 109.803 of the Revised Code. Of the foregoing appropriation item 055509, Law Enforcement Training, the Attorney General may use up to $150,000 in each fiscal year for administrative expenses associated with the program, including curriculum development. ATTORNEY GENERAL COLLECTIONS SYSTEM LEASE RENTAL PAYMENTS The foregoing appropriation item 055668, Collections System Lease Rental Payments, shall be used to make payments during the period from July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2027, pursuant to leases and agreements entered into under Section 701.10 of S.B. 310 of the 133rd General Assembly or Section 709.01 of H.B. 687 of the 134th General Assembly, with respect to financing the costs associated with the acquisition, development, implementation, and integration of the Attorney General New Collection System. NARCOTICS TASK FORCES The foregoing appropriation item 055614, Narcotics Task Forces, shall be used to support narcotics task forces funded by the Attorney General. WORKERS' COMPENSATION SECTION The Workers' Compensation Fund (Fund 1950) is entitled to receive quarterly payments from the Bureau of Workers' Compensation and the Ohio Industrial Commission to fund legal services provided to the Bureau of Workers' Compensation and the Ohio Industrial Commission during the fiscal year. In addition, the Bureau of Workers' Compensation shall transfer payments for the support of the Workers' Compensation Fraud Unit. All amounts shall be mutually agreed upon by the Attorney General, the Bureau of Workers' Compensation, and the Ohio Industrial Commission. GENERAL HOLDING ACCOUNT The foregoing appropriation item 055631, General Holding Account, shall be used to distribute moneys under the terms of grant agreements pertaining to body armor, relevant court orders, or other settlements received in a variety of cases involving the Office of the Attorney General. If it is determined that additional amounts are necessary for this purpose, the amounts are hereby appropriated. ANTITRUST SETTLEMENTS The foregoing appropriation item 055632, Antitrust Settlements, shall be used to distribute moneys under the terms of relevant court orders or other out-of-court settlements in antitrust cases or antitrust matters involving the Office of the Attorney General. If it is determined that additional amounts are necessary for this purpose, the amounts are hereby appropriated. CHARITABLE SETTLEMENT HOLDING ACCOUNT The foregoing appropriation item 055674, Charitable Settlement Holding Account, shall be used to distribute money in the Charitable Settlements Holding Account Fund (Fund 5BY1), which is created in the state treasury, under the terms of relevant court orders or other settlements received in the charitable law cases involving the Office of the Attorney General. If it is determined that additional amounts are necessary for this purpose, the amounts are hereby appropriated. On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Attorney General shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management the amount of cash receipts related to settlements received in charitable law cases and credited to the General Holding Account (Fund R004). The Director of Budget and Management shall transfer the amounts certified to the Charitable Settlements Holding Account Fund (Fund 5BY1). CONSUMER FRAUDS The foregoing appropriation item 055630, Consumer Frauds, shall be used for distribution of moneys from court-ordered judgments against sellers in actions brought by the Office of the Attorney General under sections 1334.08 and 4549.48 and division (B) of section 1345.07 of the Revised Code. These moneys shall be used to provide restitution to consumers victimized by the fraud that generated the court-ordered judgments. If it is determined that additional amounts are necessary for this purpose, the amounts are hereby appropriated. ORGANIZED CRIME COMMISSION DISTRIBUTIONS The foregoing appropriation item 055601, Organized Crime Commission Distributions, shall be used by the Organized Crime Investigations Commission, as provided by section 177.011 of the Revised Code, to reimburse political subdivisions for the expenses the political subdivisions incur when their law enforcement officers participate in an organized crime task force and to support the operations of the retail theft task force. If it is determined that additional amounts are necessary for this purpose, the amounts are hereby appropriated. COLLECTION PAYMENT REDISTRIBUTION The foregoing appropriation item 055650, Collection Payment Redistribution, shall be used for the purpose of allocating the revenue where debtors mistakenly paid the client agencies instead of the Attorney General's Collections Enforcement Section. If it is determined that additional amounts are necessary for this purpose, the amounts are hereby appropriated. Section 4. That existing Section 221.20 of H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly (as amended by H.B. 184 of the 136th General Assembly) is hereby repealed. Section 5. The General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, finds that the following sections, presented in this act as composites of the sections as amended by the acts indicated, are the resulting versions of the sections in effect prior to the effective date of the sections as presented in this act: Section 3314.03 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 10 and H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly. Section 3326.11 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 10 and H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly. Section 3328.24 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 10 and H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly.